Arkansas, session 2025, SB409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1001(4), concerning the definition of
"discriminate" used for environmental, social justice, or governance scores
or metrics, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) "Discriminate" means a company's:
(i) Refusal to engage in the trade of any goods or
services with an entity based solely on its status as an energy, fossil fuel,
firearms, or ammunition industry entity, or agricultural producer; or
*ANS346*
03/07/2025 3:34:02 PM ANS346

SB409
(ii) Termination of an existing business
relationship with an entity based solely on the entity's status as an energy,
fossil fuel, firearms, or ammunition industry entity, or agricultural
producer.
(B) "Discriminate" does not include actions by an
investment adviser according to the investment-related guidelines, policies,
or preferences of its the investment adviser's clients;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1001, concerning definitions used for
environmental, social justice, or governance scores or metrics, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(14)(A) "Agricultural producer" means a natural person or
company engaged in the production of goods derived from plants or animals.
(B) "Agricultural producer" includes without limitation:
(i) The growing of crops;
(ii) Animal husbandry; and
(iii) The production of livestock or dairy products.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1002 is amended to read as follows:
25-1-1002. List of financial services providers.
(a) The Treasurer of State shall maintain a list of financial services
providers as determined by the ESG Oversight Committee under § 25-1-1006 on
the Treasurer of State's website.
(b) The Treasurer of State shall post the list of financial services
providers that discriminate against energy companies, or firearms entities,
or agricultural producers or otherwise refuse to deal based on environmental,
social justice, and other governance-related factors on the Treasurer of
State's website.
(c)(1) Forty-five (45) days before including a financial services
provider on a list under § 25-1-1006, the ESG Oversight Committee shall send
a written notice to the financial services provider.
(2) The written notice under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall include the following information:
(A) A determination by the ESG Oversight Committee under §
25-1-1006 that the financial services provider has discriminated against
energy companies, or firearms entities, or agricultural producers or
03/07/2025 3:34:02 PM ANS346

SB409
otherwise refused to deal based on environmental, social justice, and other
governance-related factors;
(B) Identification of the evidence of discrimination
relied on by the ESG Oversight Committee, in making the determination;
(C) Placement of the financial services provider on a list
in forty-five (45) days unless, within thirty (30) days following the receipt
of the written notice, the financial services provider demonstrates that it
is not discriminating against energy companies, or firearms entities, or
agricultural producers or otherwise refusing to deal based on environmental,
social justice, and other governance-related factors; and
(D) Publication of the list will be on the Treasurer of
State's website.
(d)(1) If the ESG Oversight Committee provides written notice to a
financial services provider under subdivision (c)(1) of this section based on
information from an energy, fossil fuel, firearms, or ammunition company, or
agricultural producer, then the energy, fossil fuel, firearms, or ammunition
company, or agricultural producer shall be required to consent to the
disclosure of any financial information held by the financial services
provider of the energy, fossil fuel, firearms, or ammunition company, or
agricultural producer to the ESG Oversight Committee, whether or not the
information is confidential or proprietary, to allow the financial services
provider to demonstrate that the financial services provider is not
discriminating against energy, fossil fuel, firearms, or ammunition
companies, or agricultural producers or otherwise refusing to deal with
energy, fossil fuel, firearms, or ammunition companies, or agricultural
producers based on environmental, social justice, and other governance-
related factors.
(2) If the energy, fossil fuel, firearms, or ammunition company,
or agricultural producer refuses to consent to the disclosure of financial
information under subdivision (d)(1) of this section, then the:
(A) ESG Oversight Committee shall withdraw the written
notice to the financial services provider under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section; and
(B) Financial services provider shall not be on the list
under subsection (a) of this section.

03/07/2025 3:34:02 PM ANS346